Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.060

Appellate review.

An association may petition the superior court of the state of Washington for Thurston county for the review of any decision, ruling, requirement or other action or determination of the director, by filing its complaint, duly verified, with the clerk of the court and serving a copy thereof upon the director. Upon the filing of the complaint, the clerk of the court shall docket the same as a cause pending therein.

The director may answer the complaint and the petitioner reply thereto, and the cause shall be heard before the court as in other civil actions. Both the petitioner and the director may seek appellate review of the decision of the court to the supreme court or the court of appeals of the state of Washington.

[ 1994 c 92 s 424; 1988 c 202 s 32; 1971 c 81 s 84; 1945 c 235 s 115; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-234. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 95.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.